Utah statutes.
53-10-208.   Definition -- Offenses included on statewide warrant system -- Transportation fee to be included -- Statewide warrant system responsibility -- Quality control -- Training -- Technical support -- Transaction costs.

(1)  "Statewide warrant system" means the portion of the state court computer system that is accessible by modem from the state mainframe computer and contains:

(a)  records of criminal warrant information; and

(b)  after notice and hearing, records of protective orders issued pursuant to:

(i)  Title 77, Chapter 36, Cohabitant Abuse Procedures Act; or

(ii)  Title 78B, Chapter 7, Part 1, Cohabitant Abuse Act.

(2) (a)  The division shall include on the statewide warrant system all warrants issued for felony offenses and class A, B, and C misdemeanor offenses in the state.

(b)  The division shall include on the statewide warrant system all warrants issued for failure to appear on a traffic citation as ordered by a magistrate under Subsection 77-7-19(3).

(c)  For each warrant, the division shall indicate whether the magistrate ordered under Section 77-7-5 and Rule 6, Utah Rules of Criminal Procedure, that the accused appear in court.

(3)  The division is the agency responsible for the statewide warrant system and shall:

(a)  ensure quality control of all warrants of arrest or commitment and protective orders contained in the statewide warrant system by conducting regular validation checks with every clerk of a court responsible for entering the information on the system;

(b)  upon the expiration of the protective orders and in the manner prescribed by the division, purge information regarding protective orders described in Subsection 53-10-208.1(4) within 30 days of the time after expiration;

(c)  establish system procedures and provide training to all criminal justice agencies having access to information contained on the state warrant system;

(d)  provide technical support, program development, and systems maintenance for the operation of the system; and

(e)  pay data processing and transaction costs for state, county, and city law enforcement agencies and criminal justice agencies having access to information contained on the state warrant system.

(4) (a)  Any data processing or transaction costs not funded by legislative appropriation shall be paid on a pro rata basis by all agencies using the system during the fiscal year.

(b)  This Subsection (4) supersedes any conflicting provision in Subsection (3)(e).

